Utah statutes.
48-2c-1008.   Unclaimed distributions.

If a company has mailed three successive distributions to a member addressed to the member's address shown on the company's current record of members and the distributions have been returned as undeliverable, no further attempt to deliver distributions to that member need be made until another address for the member is made known to the company, at which time all distributions accumulated by reason of this section shall, except as otherwise provided by law, be mailed to the member at the other address.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 2001 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

